Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
PART 4 Returning Veterans Task Force

38-4-90.
Creation.

There is created within the Department of Veterans Service the Returning Veterans Task Force.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-90

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 563, § 1/SB 76.

Cross references.

Creation of veterans court division, §

15-1-17

.

38-4-91.
Membership.

The Returning Veterans Task Force shall consist of one representative each from the Department of Veterans Service appointed by the commissioner of veterans service, the Department of Community Health appointed by the commissioner of community health, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities appointed by the commissioner of behavioral health and developmental disabilities, the Department of Labor appointed by the Commissioner of Labor, the Department of Defense appointed by the adjutant general, the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia appointed by the chancellor of the Board of Regents of the University System of Georgia, and the Technical College System of Georgia appointed by the commissioner of the Technical College System of Georgia. Other agencies may be invited to participate in the task force based on needs identified over time. The member appointed by the commissioner of veterans service shall serve as chairperson of the task force.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-91

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 563, § 1/SB 76.

38-4-92.
Duties; recommendations.

The task force shall meet at least quarterly and shall investigate how state services can be provided to veterans returning from military service from which the veteran was discharged under conditions other than dishonorable within the most recent three years in order to assist them in integrating into society. The task force shall issue recommendations to each relevant state agency regarding improving the delivery of services to returning veterans. On or before November 1 of each year, the task force shall transmit specific suggestions for legislation designed to assist returning veterans to the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Governor.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-4-92

, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 563, § 1/SB 76.